Utah statutes.
48-1-20.   Continuation of partnership beyond fixed term.
When a partnership for a fixed term or particular undertaking is continued
after the termination of such term or particular undertaking without any
express agreement, the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as
they were at such termination so far as is consistent with a partnership at
will.
A continuation of the business by the partners, or such of them as habitually
acted therein during the term, without any settlement or liquidation of the
partnership affairs, is prima facie evidence of a continuation of the
partnership.
